California, session 20252026, AB574.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) The Legislature remains committed to ensuring that health care service plans and health insurers provide patients with the right care at the right time, without requiring patients or the clinicians who provide that care to have to navigate arduous, opaque, or clinically inappropriate authorization processes that delay access to care.(b) Recent practices by various health care service plans, health insurers, and their agents to limit the availability of physical therapy, including the use of computer-generated denials or modifications of treatment plans recommended by the patient’s treating clinician, are interfering in this ongoing goal of timely, appropriate care.(c) The practice to create barriers to physical therapy at levels significantly below the number of visits recognized in research literature as medically necessary to treat various conditions and consistent with visit limits specified in patients’ “Evidence of Coverage” disclosures creates confusion for patients’ reasonable expectations of coverage and puts patients at risk for poor outcomes, which affects their long-term health.SEC. 2. Section 1367.26 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1367.26. (a) A health care service plan contract issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, that provides coverage for physical therapy shall not, for a new condition, require prior authorization for the initial 12 treatment visits for physical therapy. For a recurring condition, the plan may impose prior authorization if the individual seeks care within 180 days of their last physical therapy intervention for that condition.(b) (1) Prior to treatment, a physical therapy provider shall verify the enrollee’s coverage and disclose the enrollee’s cost sharing, including the maximum out-of-pocket expense the enrollee may be charged per visit if the health care service plan denies coverage for services rendered. The disclosure shall encourage the enrollee to contact the plan for coverage information and shall indicate that by signing the separate written consent, an enrollee does not give up any rights otherwise applicable to an enrollee under this chapter, including under Section 1379. The physical therapy provider shall also disclose if the physical therapy provider is not in the network of the enrollee’s health care service plan.(2) For costs that may not be covered by the enrollee’s plan contract, the provider shall obtain separate written consent that includes a written estimate of the cost of care for which the enrollee is responsible if coverage is denied or otherwise not applicable. The consent document and cost estimate shall be provided to the enrollee in the language spoken by the enrollee if the language is a Medi-Cal threshold language, as defined in Section 128552.(c) This section does not exempt a noncontracting individual health professional providing services at a contracting health facility from the requirements of Section 1371.9.(d) This section shall not apply to a Medi-Cal managed care plan that contracts with the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of, or Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591) of, Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.SEC. 3. Section 10123.75 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:10123.75. (a) A health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, that provides coverage for physical therapy shall not, for a new condition, require prior authorization for the initial 12 treatment visits for physical therapy. For a recurring condition, the insurer may impose prior authorization if the individual seeks care within 180 days of their last physical therapy intervention for that condition.(b) (1) Prior to treatment, a physical therapy provider shall verify the insured’s coverage and disclose the insured’s cost sharing, including the maximum out-of-pocket expense the insured may be charged per visit if the health insurer denies coverage for services rendered. The disclosure shall encourage the insured to contact the insurer for coverage information, and indicate that by signing the separate written consent, an insured does not give up any rights otherwise applicable to the insured under this chapter. The physical therapy provider shall also disclose if the physical therapy provider is not in the network of the insured’s health insurance policy.(2) For costs that may not be covered by the insured’s policy, the provider shall obtain separate written consent that includes a written estimate of the cost of care for which the insured is responsible if coverage is denied or otherwise not applicable. The consent document and cost estimate shall be provided to the insured in the language spoken by the insured if the language is a Medi-Cal threshold language, as defined in Section 128552 of the Health and Safety Code.(c) This section does not exempt a noncontracting individual health professional providing services at a contracting health facility from the requirements of Section 10112.8.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.